Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-319
Investigation by Secretary of State
for collection purposes; duty of county clerk.

Any county
clerk shall, upon request of the Secretary of State, furnish him or her with
such information as is shown by the records of his or her office concerning
corporations located within his or her county and subject to sections 21-301
to 21-330. The Secretary of
State, or any person deputized by him or her for the purpose of determining
the amount of the occupation tax due from
such corporation, shall have authority to investigate and determine the facts
showing the proportion of the paid-up capital stock of the company represented
by its property and business in this state.

Laws 1913, c. 240, § 19, p. 751;

R.S.1913, § 779;

C.S.1922, § 697;

C.S.1929, § 24-1719;

R.S.1943, § 21-319;

Laws 1988, LB 800, § 4;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 250.